ani_rus.lexd
аб<ADJ>:широкий<ADJ>
абдаллъери<V>:глупеть<V>
абжоллу<V>:смешивать<V>
аблъин<ADJ>:похожий<ADJ>
абур<N>:грудь<N>
абчери<V>:купать<V>
абчери<V>:купаться<V>
абчери<V>:стирать<V>
авараг<N>:пророк<N>
авъал<N>:орех<N>
авъара<N>:шапка<N>
адаб<N>:уважение<N>
адада<ADV>:напрасно<ADV>
адат<N>:обычай<N>
адлу<N>:порядок<N>
аздагьу<N>:дракон<N>
айиб<N>:вина<N>
акъил<ADJ>:мудрый<ADJ>
акълу<N>:совет<N>
ала<N>:этаж<N>
алам<N>:толпа<N>
алахи<N>:кутан<N>
алахи<N>:пастбище<N>
алджан<N>:рай<N>
алхIамдулиля:спасибо
алхулIи<ADJ>:дикий<ADJ>
амал<N>:характер<N>
амру<N>:приказ<N>
анга<N>:ветвь<N>
анга<N>:ветка<N>
ангурбоцIо<N>:шакал<N>
анжи<N>:клеймо<N>
анжи<N>:метка<N>
анжиди<N>:топор<N>
анзи<N>:снег<N>
анлъери<V>:слышать<V>
анлъи<N>:баран<N>
анниб<ADJ>:сырой<ADJ>
анса<N>:трость<N>
анччери<V>:слушать<V>
анччери<V>:смысл<V>
анччиб<N>:свидетель<N>
анччиб<N>:свидетельница<N>
анччу<N>:тень<N>
апицер<N>:офицер<N>
арада<N>:пушка<N>
аракъи<N>:водка<N>
аргъван<ADJ>:мутный<ADJ>
арзи<N>:жалоба<N>
арзи<N>:заявление<N>
арком<N>:ложка<N>
ароллу<V>:рубить<V>
арпа<N>:клещ<N>
архинну<V>:открывать<V>
архинну<V>:открываться<V>
асаламгIалайкум:приветствие
асар<N>:впечатление<N>
аскIар<N>:армия<N>
аскIар<N>:войско<N>
аста<N>:сноп<N>
атIилъи<N>:простор<N>
ахир<N>:конец<N>
ахъи<N>:очаг<N>
ахъи<N>:печь<N>
ахъу<N>:бедро<N>
ахъу<N>:ляжка<N>
ахьал<N>:половина<N>
баба<N>:мать<N>
бабадир<N>:заикание<N>
багIадери<V>:блеять<V>
багвери<V>:считать<V>
багимаша<ADJ>:дырявый<ADJ>
багин<N>:дыра<N>
багин<N>:нора<N>
багъу<ADJ>:красивый<ADJ>
багьа<N>:цена<N>
багьанна<N>:причина<N>
бади<ADV>:навстречу<ADV>
бадуши<N>:утка<N>
бажаруноллу<V>:мочь<V>
байан<N>:ясность<N>
байбихьи<N>:начало<N>
байбихьунну<V>:начинаться<V>
байдан<N>:равнина<N>
бакIарунну<V>:собирать<V>
бакIарунну<V>:собираться<V>
бакки<N>:внимание<N>
балкан<N>:падаль<N>
бар<ADJ>:острый<ADJ>
баркала<EXCL>:спасибо<EXCL>
барссуб<ADJ>:тупой<ADJ>
басинну<V>:взвешивать<V>
басинну<V>:мерить<V>
батIа<ADJ>:отдельный<ADJ>
батIа<ADV>:отдельно<ADV>
батIалъир<N>:разница<N>
бахIарай<N>:невеста<N>
бахери<V>:драться<V>
бахери<V>:лаять<V>
бахинну<V>:шить<V>
бахоллу<V>:продавать<V>
бацIери<V>:соединять<V>
башлухъи<N>:башлык<N>
баъери<V>:читать<V>
баъир<N>:чтение<N>
бегулъери<V>:пьянеть<V>
бегулъий<ADJ>:пьяный<ADJ>
бегъва<N>:сеновал<N>
бегьудибасси<POST>:сзади<POST>
беддери<V>:оставаться<V>
беддери<V>:оставлять<V>
беддонну<V>:говорить<V>
бежери<V>:жарить<V>
бежун<N>:игла<N>
бейкьигу<NUM>:восемь<NUM>
бейкьилдеб<NUM>:восьмой<NUM>
бейкьицIолгу<NUM>:восемьдесят<NUM>
бейлIибешенугу<NUM>:восемьсот<NUM>
бекIерхъанну<V>:сплющиваться<V>
бекIкIуб<ADJ>:горячий<ADJ>
бекIуъери<V>:плакать<V>
бекъашери<V>:грабить<V>
бекъашолери<V>:прятать<V>
бекъиркъанну<V>:морщиниться<V>
бекъиркъанну<V>:морщиться<V>
бекъуб<ADJ>:густой<ADJ>
бекъуб<ADJ>:сухой<ADJ>
бекьери<V>:пахать<V>
бекьери<V>:сеять<V>
бекьи<N>:хлев<N>
бел<N>:лопата<N>
белIери<V>:ходить<V>
белълъери<V>:смеяться<V>
бергъери<V>:шевелиться<V>
бергъоллу<V>:качать<V>
бергъоллу<V>:шевелить<V>
бергьинну<V>:радоваться<V>
бергьонну<V>:радовать<V>
берка<N>:змея<N>
беркъа<ADV>:рано<ADV>
бертин<N>:брак<N>
бертин<N>:свадьба<N>
берхьунну<V>:топтать<V>
берцIцIом<ADJ>:чистый<ADJ>
берчIери<V>:доить<V>
бершери<V>:менять<V>
бершоллу<V>:меняться<V>
бесун<N>:нож<N>
беху-бекъудиба<ADV>:обратно<ADV>
беху-бехудиба<ADV>:обратно<ADV>
бехудиба<ADV>:обратно<ADV>
бехудусседу<ADV>:подряд<ADV>
бехумугъул<N>:курдюк<N>
бехун<N>:плечо<N>
беххиркъил<N>:ягодица<N>
беххула<ADJ>:высокий<ADJ>
беххула<ADJ>:длинный<ADJ>
беххула<ADJ>:долгий<ADJ>
бехъащери<V>:воровать<V>
бехъиссорий<ADV>:вокруг<ADV>
бецIцIомийдери<V>:чистить<V>
беццихъери<V>:хвалить<V>
бечIанну<V>:вянуть<V>
бечIедир<ADJ>:черный<ADJ>
бечIедирлъери<V>:чернеть<V>
бечIугу<ADJ>:пустой<ADJ>
бечIуйдери<V>:разгружать<V>
бечIуха<ADJ>:большой<ADJ>
беча<N>:просо<N>
бешен<N>:гнездо<N>
бешен<N>:матрац<N>
бешен<N>:постель<N>
бешенугу<NUM>:сто<NUM>
бещери<V>:ткать<V>
бещийа<ADJ>:прочный<ADJ>
беъора<ADJ>:тонкий<ADJ>
бигьолгу<ADV>:много<ADV>
бигьу<ADV>:слишком<ADV>
бигьу<ADV>:часто<ADV>
бигьулгуссу<ADV>:немного<ADV>
бижунну<V>:выращивать<V>
бижунну<V>:расти<V>
бикIвери<V>:быть<V>
бикIкIунну<V>:глотать<V>
бикIоллу<V>:класть<V>
биквери<V>:блестеть<V>
биколлу<V>:зажигать<V>
биконну<V>:есть<V>
биконну<V>:кормить<V>
биконну<V>:кушать<V>
бикъвери<V>:сохнуть<V>
бикьинну<V>:надевать<V>
бил<N>:гора<N>
билъонну<V>:варить<V>
билъонну<V>:вариться<V>
бискин<ADJ>:бедный<ADJ>
бискинлъери<V>:беднеть<V>
бискинлъир<N>:бедность<N>
бисонну<V>:находить<V>
биссиб<ADJ>:ваш<ADJ>
биссил<PRON>:вы<PRON>
битIери<V>:заблудиться<V>
битIери<V>:терять<V>
битIи<ADJ>:правильный<ADJ>
битIи<ADJ>:прямой<ADJ>
битIи<ADJ>:прямой<ADJ>
битIи<ADV>:точно<ADV>
битIибиши<ADJ>:настоящий<ADJ>
битIигу<ADV>:действительно<ADV>
битIиссу<ADV>:неправильно<ADV>
битIонниб<ADJ>:мокрый<ADJ>
битон<N>:бидон<N>
бихери<V>:брать<V>
бихери<V>:покупать<V>
бихонну<V>:ссориться<V>
биххери<V>:разводиться<V>
бихъинну<V>:ломаться<V>
бицIцIиб<ADJ>:полный<ADJ>
бичIери<V>:гаснуть<V>
бичIери<V>:портиться<V>
бичIери<V>:умирать<V>
бичIоб<ADJ>:испорченный<ADJ>
бичIой<ADJ>:мертвый<ADJ>
бичIоллу<V>:портить<V>
бичIоссуб<ADJ>:целый<ADJ>
бичIчIери<V>:встать<V>
бичIчIери<V>:просыпаться<V>
бичIчIунну<V>:понимать<V>
биччери<V>:держать<V>
биччери<V>:ловить<V>
биччери<V>:хватать<V>
биши<ADJ>:толстый<ADJ>
биши<ADJ>:толстяк<ADJ>
бишилъир<N>:толщина<N>
бишо<N>:шуба<N>
биъери<V>:приходить<V>
биъунну<V>:созревать<V>
бокьараб<ADJ>:любой<ADJ>
бокьу<POST>:между<POST>
бокьусси<ADJ>:средний<ADJ>
борчIонну<V>:спасать<V>
босо<N>:цвет<N>
ботIи<ADJ>:слепой<ADJ>
ботIи<ADJ>:темный<ADJ>
ботIидохъи<ADV>:впотьмах<ADV>
ботIилъери<V>:слепнуть<V>
бохор<ADJ>:старый<ADJ>
бохорлъери<V>:стареть<V>
боххинну<V>:сосать<V>
боцIо<N>:волк<N>
бочIери<V>:выбирать<V>
бочо<ADJ>:короткий<ADJ>
боши<N>:детеныш<N>
бошицIцIекIа<N>:мизинец<N>
боъогу<NUM>:четыре<NUM>
боъолдеб<NUM>:четвертый<NUM>
боъоцIолгу<NUM>:сорок<NUM>
буги<N>:пища<N>
бугъа<N>:бык<N>
бугьу<N>:сова<N>
бужери<V>:верить<V>
бужуролIи<ADJ>:доверчивый<ADJ>
букIоллу<V>:сбивать<V>
буколлу<V>:ронять<V>
букъери<V>:кроить<V>
букъери<V>:резать<V>
букьиб<ADJ>:жаркий<ADJ>
букьин<ADJ>:горький<ADJ>
булIери<V>:закончить<V>
булIери<V>:закончиться<V>
бура<N>:ягненок<N>
бурери<V>:летать<V>
буртIа<ADJ>:богатый<ADJ>
буртина<N>:бурка<N>
бурчIина<N>:ячмень<N>
буссурман<N>:мусульманин<N>
буссурман<N>:мусульманка<N>
бутан<N>:клевета<N>
бухери<V>:отнимать<V>
буцIери<V>:таять<V>
буцIоллу<V>:плавить<V>
буцIоллу<V>:таять<V>
буцIцIир<N>:скот<N>
бучIонну<V>:приоткрывать<V>
бучIчIоллу<V>:мстить<V>
бучIчIунну<V>:убегать<V>
бушери<V>:красить<V>
бушери<V>:мазать<V>
буъинну<V>:идти<V>
вабаъи<N>:холера<N>
вагьой<N>:драка<N>
васийат<N>:завещание<N>
ватIан<N>:родина<N>
ваъаза<N>:проповедь<N>
вейхъвери<V>:ругать<V>
велIери<V>:двигаться<V>
вехудивасси<ADJ>:последний<ADJ>
вехудусси<ADJ>:следующий<ADJ>
вино<N>:вино<N>
воцци<N>:брат<N>
вошо<N>:сын<N>
вугъери<V>:задерживать<V>
вугъери<V>:останавливаться<V>
вукквери<V>:падать<V>
гIалам<N>:толпа<N>
гIаламати<N>:чудо<N>
гIалим<N>:ученая<N>
гIалим<N>:ученый<N>
гIахълулъай<N>:воспитание<N>
гIэлму<N>:учение<N>
гага<N>:косточка<N>
газ<N>:газ<N>
газа<N>:кирка<N>
гали<N>:шаг<N>
гама<N>:половник<N>
гамущи<N>:буйвол<N>
гару<N>:воротник<N>
гару<N>:шея<N>
гачи<N>:известь<N>
гвангъунну<V>:вспыхивать<V>
гверзу<N>:щека<N>
геду<N>:кошка<N>
гежи<N>:сука<N>
гел<N>:сковорода<N>
гелоллу<V>:вешать<V>
гелчи<N>:паутина<N>
гидал<N>:игра<N>
гиза<N>:корзина<N>
гимура<N>:бублик<N>
гиригирери<V>:катиться<V>
го<EXCL>:на<EXCL>
гожо<N>:клык<N>
гор<N>:круг<N>
гоъи<ADJ>:глухой<ADJ>
гоъилъери<V>:глохнуть<V>
гугарунну<V>:бороться<V>
гуггу<N>:кукушка<N>
гудур<N>:капкан<N>
гуккунну<V>:обманывать<V>
гулла<N>:пуля<N>
гун<N>:толокно<N>
гургул<N>:индюк<N>
гургума<ADJ>:круглый<ADJ>
гурдо<N>:платье<N>
гурдо<N>:рубашка<N>
гуржи<N>:грузин<N>
гурушка<N>:кружка<N>
гъа<N>:вымя<N>
гъа<N>:фундамент<N>
гъадара<N>:тарелка<N>
гъадил<N>:загон<N>
гъадукIол<N>:пень<N>
гъайа<N>:изъян<N>
гъалай<N>:олово<N>
гъалатIи<N>:ошибка<N>
гъалбацI<N>:лев<N>
гъалир<N>:калитка<N>
гъалмагъар<N>:ссора<N>
гъалъа<N>:лоза<N>
гъан<N>:хлеб<N>
гъанни<N>:ворона<N>
гъаргъадери<V>:блеять<V>
гъарцIцIи<N>:облепиха<N>
гъацIа<N>:кузнечик<N>
гъвамарссу<N>:сундук<N>
гъванкишери<V>:чавкать<V>
гъварани<N>:верблюд<N>
гъваркъи<N>:земляника<N>
гъвен<N>:жало<N>
гъвенчIил<ADJ>:кривой<ADJ>
гъижи<N>:холм<N>
гъобгъо<N>:куропатка<N>
гъогъу<N>:щебень<N>
гъугъу<N>:голубь<N>
гъузи<N>:грязь<N>
гъулгъудери<V>:ворчать<V>
гъулгъудери<V>:рычать<V>
гъуммери<V>:бадаться<V>
гъуммери<V>:бодаться<V>
гъун<N>:куча<N>
гъурери<V>:скользить<V>
гьабу<N>:уголь<N>
гьава<N>:воздух<N>
гьаджатилъир<N>:нужда<N>
гьаджатунну<V>:понадобиться<V>
гьадур<ADJ>:готовый<ADJ>
гьадурлъир<N>:готовность<N>
гьайгьай<ADV>:конечно<ADV>
гьайман<N>:баран<N>
гьакIа<N>:штраф<N>
гьакъаб<ADJ>:истинный<ADJ>
гьакъийдери<V>:унижать<V>
гьакъу<N>:дом<N>
гьакъу<N>:комната<N>
гьал<N>:пар<N>
гьалли<N>:зрение<N>
гьалтIухъан<N>:рабочая<N>
гьалтIухъан<N>:рабочий<N>
гьалтери<V>:остывать<V>
гьалхи<N>:отдых<N>
гьалчIинну<V>:смотреть<V>
гьаморхи<N>:осел<N>
гьанкIери<V>:качаться<V>
гьанкIо<N>:гвоздь<N>
гьанкьакIур<N>:оса<N>
гьантIикIа<N>:ухо<N>
гьанчIчIил<ADJ>:правый<ADJ>
гьанъо<ADJ>:беременная<ADJ>
гьанъо<N>:пот<N>
гьарза<ADJ>:изобильный<ADJ>
гьарзалъир<N>:изобилие<N>
гьаркIу<N>:глаз<N>
гьатIан<N>:воскресенье<N>
гьатIи<N>:тесто<N>
гьацIа<ADJ>:белый<ADJ>
гьацIайдери<V>:белить<V>
гьацIалъери<V>:белеть<V>
гьацIалъери<V>:седеть<V>
гьаъакьери<V>:зевать<V>
гьаъери<ADV>:напоказ<ADV>
гьаъери<V>:видеть<V>
гьебцIери<V>:подниматься<V>
гьебцIоллу<V>:поднимать<V>
гьекIуб<ADJ>:посторонний<ADJ>
гьеква<N>:человек<N>
гьеллери<V>:бегать<V>
гьеллери<V>:бежать<V>
гьеллиб<ADV>:бегом<ADV>
гьенебдий<ADJ>:такой<ADJ>
гьервади<ADV>:прочь<ADV>
гьечIодоъо<ADV>:вечером<ADV>
гьечIодоъо<ADV>:ночью<ADV>
гьечIодоъосси<ADJ>:ночной<ADJ>
гьикьим<N>:корень<N>
гьикьу<ADV>:вниз<ADV>
гьикьу<ADV>:внизу<ADV>
гьикьу<POST>:под<POST>
гьикьуккуси<ADJ>:нижний<ADJ>
гьиму<N>:бородавка<N>
гьиму<N>:шило<N>
гьимъу<N>:дно<N>
гьин<N>:кровь<N>
гьинджелло<ADV>:еще<ADV>
гьинджесси<ADV>:снова<ADV>
гьинкIкIу<N>:мышь<N>
гьинкIкIур<N>:моча<N>
гьину<ADV>:внутри<ADV>
гьинукку<ADV>:изнутри<ADV>
гьинусси<ADJ>:внутренний<ADJ>
гьинцIо<N>:камень<N>
гьинцIошамшал<N>:рогатка<N>
гьинцIцIу<N>:гумно<N>
гьинцIцIу<N>:дверь<N>
гьир<N>:медь<N>
гьири<ADJ>:красный<ADJ>
гьиро<N>:туман<N>
гьирцIилъер<N>:высота<N>
гьитIо<ADV>:достаточно<ADV>
гьицIичол<N>:ласточка<N>
гьишкIи<N>:качели<N>
гьиъа<ADV>:наверху<ADV>
гьиъасси<ADJ>:верхний<ADJ>
гьиъаъон<ADV>:выше<ADV>
гьиъо<ADV>:наверх<ADV>
гьиᵸгьиᵸ<N>:груша<N>
гьиᵸрилъери<V>:краснеть<V>
гьобаро<ADV>:сюда<ADV>
гьобгьоб<N>:удод<N>
гьовкIвери<V>:садиться<V>
гьокIору<ADJ>:тяжелый<ADJ>
гьокIорулъери<V>:тяжелеть<V>
гьокIорулъир<N>:вес<N>
гьокьу<N>:гребень<N>
гьокьу<N>:неделя<N>
гьокьубешенугу<NUM>:семьсот<NUM>
гьокьугу<NUM>:семь<NUM>
гьокьуцIолгу<NUM>:семьдесят<NUM>
гьолIийа<N>:охапка<N>
гьолIулдеб<NUM>:седьмой<NUM>
гьоли<N>:фасоль<N>
гьолъусси<ADJ>:здешний<ADJ>
гьомдери<V>:выть<V>
гьомологъи<N>:друг<N>
гьомологъи<N>:подруга<N>
гьондолъукку<ADV>:оттуда<ADV>
гьонкъо<N>:жажда<N>
гьонно<N>:лоб<N>
гьонокьей<ADV>:так<ADV>
гьонолъу<ADV>:здесь<ADV>
гьонолъукку<ADV>:отсюда<ADV>
гьону<N>:мозг<N>
гьонхъисси<N>:грипп<N>
гьорчIи<N>:жена<N>
гьорчIи<N>:самка<N>
гьоцIогу<NUM>:десять<NUM>
гьочIо-ричIин<N>:скорпион<N>
гьочIобешенугу<NUM>:девятьсот<NUM>
гьочIогу<NUM>:девять<NUM>
гьочIолдеб<ADJ>:девятый<ADJ>
гьочIомусси<N>:барсук<N>
гьочIоцIолгу<NUM>:девяносто<NUM>
гьоъор<N>:пол<N>
гьугъибахъиле<EXCL>:неужели<EXCL>
гьуду<ADV>:там<ADV>
гьудуба<ADV>:туда<ADV>
гьума<N>:столб<N>
гьуммедери<V>:мычать<V>
гьунар<N>:подвиг<N>
гьунар<N>:способность<N>
гьунцIцIи<N>:мед<N>
гьунчIа<N>:сено<N>
гьургу<N>:войлок<N>
гьуршунну<V>:разбрасывать<V>
гьуᵸ<EXCL>:да<EXCL>
давла<N>:добыча<N>
дада<N>:отец<N>
дада<N>:папа<N>
дан<N>:вещи<N>
дан<N>:вещь<N>
дарам<N>:торговля<N>
дарсси<N>:урок<N>
дару<N>:лекарство<N>
даъба<N>:спор<N>
даъбадунну<V>:спорить<V>
ден<PRON>:я<PRON>
держикIа<N>:тыква<N>
джабери<V>:убивать<V>
джабери<V>:ударять<V>
джаваб<N>:ответ<N>
джаназа<N>:труп<N>
джахIда<N>:зависть<N>
джахIда<N>:неприязнь<N>
джергъин<N>:бубен<N>
